Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-701
Public Service Commission; jurisdiction denied.

The commission shall have no jurisdiction over the rates, tolls, rents, and charges of districts organized under sections 70-601 to 70-672.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 1, p. 1422;

Laws 1987, LB 28, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 113.